New York, session 2025-2026, S3075.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The alcoholic beverage control law is amended by adding a 2 new section 106-c to read as follows: 3 § 106-c. Sale of private-label liquor at retail for consumption off 4 the premises. 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms 5 shall have the following meanings: 6 (a) "Private-label liquor" means liquor distilled by a licensed 7 distiller and bottled by a bottler in containers bearing a brand name or 8 trademark for sale at retail directly by the owner or licensee of such 9 brand name or trademark, or through retail dealers affiliated with such 10 owner or licensee by a cooperative or franchise agreement. 11 (b) "Holder of a license to sell liquor at retail for consumption on 12 the premises" shall mean any person or entity holding a valid license 13 issued under section sixty-four of this chapter permitting the sale of 14 alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption at a restaurant. 15 (c) "Licensed distiller" shall mean any person or entity holding a 16 valid license to produce distilled spirits in New York state issued 17 under section sixty-one of this chapter. 18 2. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a holder 19 of a license to sell liquor at retail for consumption on the premises 20 may sell bottles of private-label liquor at retail for off-premises 21 consumption provided that such private-label liquor is: 22 (i) distilled within the borders of the state of New York by a 23 licensed distiller; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07295-01-5 S. 3075 2 1 (ii) not sold in excess of a volume of seventy-five thousand gallons 2 per year. 3 (b) The sale of private-label liquor under this subdivision shall be 4 conducted in accordance with all applicable laws and regulations 5 pertaining to the sale of alcoholic beverages, including but not limited 6 to the requirement that such sales occur only during hours when the sale 7 of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption is permitted. 8 (c) The label of the private-label liquor shall clearly indicate that 9 the product is produced by a licensed distiller. 10 (d) The total annual sales volume of private-label liquors as allowed 11 under this section by a holder of a license to sell liquor at retail for 12 consumption on the premises shall be reported to the liquor authority 13 annually by such holder of a license to sell liquor at retail for 14 consumption on the premises. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law.